dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.aff
FLAG long
SFX Dw Y 81
SFX Dw ојдти шел .
SFX Dw јдти шла .
SFX Dw јдти шло .
SFX Dw јдти шли .
SFX Dw ти у .
SFX Dw ти ем .
SFX Dw ти еш .
SFX Dw ти е .
SFX Dw ти емо .
SFX Dw ти ете .
SFX Dw ти ут .
SFX Dw ти ех .
SFX Dw ти еше .
SFX Dw ти ехмо .
SFX Dw ти есте .
SFX Dw ти еху .
SFX Dw ти и .
SFX Dw ти имо .
SFX Dw ти ите .
SFX Dw ти учи .
SFX Dw ти учего .
SFX Dw ти учему .
SFX Dw ти учим .
SFX Dw ти учем .
SFX Dw ти учих .
SFX Dw ти учими .
SFX Dw ти уча .
SFX Dw ти учу .
SFX Dw ти учеј .
SFX Dw ти учеју .
SFX Dw ти уче .
SFX Dw ти омы .
SFX Dw ти омого .
SFX Dw ти омому .
SFX Dw ти омым .
SFX Dw ти омом .
SFX Dw ти омо .
SFX Dw ти ома .
SFX Dw ти ому .
SFX Dw ти омој .
SFX Dw ти омоју .
SFX Dw ти оми .
SFX Dw ти оме .
SFX Dw ти омых .
SFX Dw ти омым .
SFX Dw ти омыми .
SFX Dw ти омо .
SFX Dw ојдти шевши .
SFX Dw ојдти шевшего .
SFX Dw ојдти шевшему .
SFX Dw ојдти шевшим .
SFX Dw ојдти шевшем .
SFX Dw ојдти шевших .
SFX Dw ојдти шевшими .
SFX Dw ојдти шевша .
SFX Dw ојдти шевшу .
SFX Dw ојдти шевшеј .
SFX Dw ојдти шевшеју .
SFX Dw ојдти шевше .
SFX Dw ти ены .
SFX Dw ти еного .
SFX Dw ти еному .
SFX Dw ти еным .
SFX Dw ти еном .
SFX Dw ти ени .
SFX Dw ти ене .
SFX Dw ти еных .
SFX Dw ти еными .
SFX Dw ти ена .
SFX Dw ти ену .
SFX Dw ти еној .
SFX Dw ти еноју .
SFX Dw ти ено .
SFX Dw ти енје/xPxE .
SFX Dw ти енја/xPxE .
SFX Dw ти енју/xPxE .
SFX Dw ти енјем/xPxE .
SFX Dw ти ениј/xPxE .
SFX Dw ти енјам/xPxE .
SFX Dw ти енјами/xPxE .
SFX Dw ти енјах/xPxE .

SFX Dx Y 11
SFX Dx 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dx 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX Dx ок ки/xPxE .
SFX Dx ок ка/xPxE .
SFX Dx ок ков/xPxE .
SFX Dx ок ку/xPxE .
SFX Dx ок ках/xPxE .
SFX Dx ок кам/xPxE .
SFX Dx ок ком/xPxE .
SFX Dx ок ками/xPxE .
SFX Dx ок че/xPxE .

SFX Dy Y 11
SFX Dy 0 0/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX Dy 0 е/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 а/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 ев/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 у/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 ах/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 ам/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 ем/xPxE .
SFX Dy 0 ами/xPxE .
SFX Dy ц че/xPxE .

SFX Dz Y 5
SFX Dz а у .
SFX Dz а ы .
SFX Dz а є .
SFX Dz а оју .
SFX Dz а о .

SFX EA Y 62
SFX EA ти л .
SFX EA ти ла .
SFX EA ти ло .
SFX EA ти ли .
SFX EA ети му .
SFX EA ети мем .
SFX EA ети меш .
SFX EA ети ме .
SFX EA ети мемо .
SFX EA ети мете .
SFX EA ети мут .
SFX EA ти х .
SFX EA ти ше .
SFX EA ти хмо .
SFX EA ти сте .
SFX EA ти ху .
SFX EA ети ми .
SFX EA ети мимо .
SFX EA ети мите .
SFX EA ети мучи .
SFX EA ети мучего .
SFX EA ети мучему .
SFX EA ети мучим .
SFX EA ети мучем .
SFX EA ети мучих .
SFX EA ети мучими .
SFX EA ети муча .
SFX EA ети мучу .
SFX EA ети мучеј .
SFX EA ети мучеју .
SFX EA ети муче .
SFX EA ети мемы .
SFX EA ети мемого .
SFX EA ети мемому .
SFX EA ети мемым .
SFX EA ети мемом .
SFX EA ети мемо .
SFX EA ети мема .
SFX EA ети мему .
SFX EA ети мемој .
SFX EA ети мемоју .
SFX EA ети меми .
SFX EA ети меме .
SFX EA ети мемых .
SFX EA ети мемым .
SFX EA ети мемыми .
SFX EA ти вши .
SFX EA ти вшего .
SFX EA ти вшему .
SFX EA ти вшим .
SFX EA ти вшем .
SFX EA ти вших .
SFX EA ти вшими .
SFX EA ти вша .
SFX EA ти вшу .
SFX EA ти вшеј .
SFX EA ти вшеју .
SFX EA ти вше .
SFX EA и ы .
SFX EA и а .
SFX EA и о .
SFX EA и је .

SFX EB Y 9
SFX EB 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EB о о/xPxBxO .
SFX EB о а/xPxE .
SFX EB ко ек/xPxE .
SFX EB о у/xPxE .
SFX EB о ах/xPxE .
SFX EB о ам/xPxE .
SFX EB 0 м/xPxE .
SFX EB о ами/xPxE .

SFX EC Y 62
SFX EC ти л .
SFX EC ти ла .
SFX EC ти ло .
SFX EC ти ли .
SFX EC јети ојму .
SFX EC јети ојмем .
SFX EC јети ојмеш .
SFX EC јети ојме .
SFX EC јети ојмемо .
SFX EC јети ојмете .
SFX EC јети ојмут .
SFX EC ти х .
SFX EC ти ше .
SFX EC ти хмо .
SFX EC ти сте .
SFX EC ти ху .
SFX EC јети ојми .
SFX EC јети ојмимо .
SFX EC јети ојмите .
SFX EC јети ојмучи .
SFX EC јети ојмучего .
SFX EC јети ојмучему .
SFX EC јети ојмучим .
SFX EC јети ојмучем .
SFX EC јети ојмучих .
SFX EC јети ојмучими .
SFX EC јети ојмуча .
SFX EC јети ојмучу .
SFX EC јети ојмучеј .
SFX EC јети ојмучеју .
SFX EC јети ојмуче .
SFX EC јети ојмемы .
SFX EC јети ојмемого .
SFX EC јети ојмемому .
SFX EC јети ојмемым .
SFX EC јети ојмемом .
SFX EC јети ојмемо .
SFX EC јети ојмема .
SFX EC јети ојмему .
SFX EC јети ојмемој .
SFX EC јети ојмемоју .
SFX EC јети ојмеми .
SFX EC јети ојмеме .
SFX EC јети ојмемых .
SFX EC јети ојмемым .
SFX EC јети ојмемыми .
SFX EC ти вши .
SFX EC ти вшего .
SFX EC ти вшему .
SFX EC ти вшим .
SFX EC ти вшем .
SFX EC ти вших .
SFX EC ти вшими .
SFX EC ти вша .
SFX EC ти вшу .
SFX EC ти вшеј .
SFX EC ти вшеју .
SFX EC ти вше .
SFX EC и ы .
SFX EC и а .
SFX EC и о .
SFX EC и је .

SFX ED Y 31
SFX ED ти л .
SFX ED ти ла .
SFX ED ти ло .
SFX ED ти ли .
SFX ED овати ују .
SFX ED овати ујем .
SFX ED овати ујеш .
SFX ED овати ује .
SFX ED овати ујемо .
SFX ED овати ујете .
SFX ED овати ујут .
SFX ED ти х .
SFX ED ти ше .
SFX ED ти хмо .
SFX ED ти сте .
SFX ED ти ху .
SFX ED овати уј .
SFX ED овати ујмо .
SFX ED овати ујте .
SFX ED овати ујучи .
SFX ED овати ујуча .
SFX ED овати ујуче .
SFX ED овати ујемы .
SFX ED овати ујема .
SFX ED ти вши .
SFX ED ти вша .
SFX ED ти вше .
SFX ED ти ны .
SFX ED ти на .
SFX ED ти но .
SFX ED ти нје .

SFX EE Y 5
SFX EE 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EE е о/xPxBxO .
SFX EE е ых/xPxE .
SFX EE е ым/xPxE .
SFX EE е ыми/xPxE .

SFX EF Y 5
SFX EF а у .
SFX EF а е .
SFX EF а и .
SFX EF а еју .
SFX EF а о .

SFX EG Y 8
SFX EG 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EG 0 е/xPxBxO .
SFX EG енј нји/xPxE .
SFX EG енј нјиј/xPxE .
SFX EG енј нјах/xPxE .
SFX EG енј нјам/xPxE .
SFX EG енј нјју/xPxE .
SFX EG енј нјами/xPxE .

SFX EH Y 4
SFX EH 0 бе .
SFX EH е обє .
SFX EH е и .
SFX EH е обоју .

SFX EI Y 10
SFX EI 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EI и о/xPxBxO .
SFX EI и у/xPxE .
SFX EI и ев/xPxE .
SFX EI и е/xPxE .
SFX EI и ах/xPxE .
SFX EI и ам/xPxE .
SFX EI и еју/xPxE .
SFX EI и ами/xPxE .
SFX EI и о/xPxE .

SFX EJ Y 8
SFX EJ 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EJ и е/xPxBxO .
SFX EJ и его/xPxE .
SFX EJ 0 х/xPxE .
SFX EJ и ем/xPxE .
SFX EJ и ему/xPxE .
SFX EJ 0 м/xPxE .
SFX EJ 0 ми/xPxE .

SFX EK Y 12
SFX EK 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EK 0 о/xPxBxO .
SFX EK ыровоз ировоз/xPxE .
SFX EK ыровоз ировозы/xPxE .
SFX EK ыровоз ировоза/xPxE .
SFX EK ыровоз ировозов/xPxE .
SFX EK ыровоз ировозу/xPxE .
SFX EK ыровоз ировозах/xPxE .
SFX EK ыровоз ировозам/xPxE .
SFX EK ыровоз ировозом/xPxE .
SFX EK ыровоз ировозами/xPxE .
SFX EK ыровоз ировозе/xPxE .

SFX EL Y 6
SFX EL 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EL а е/xPxBxO .
SFX EL а 0 .
SFX EL 0 х/xPxE .
SFX EL 0 м/xPxE .
SFX EL 0 ми/xPxE .

SFX EM Y 6
SFX EM 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EM и е/xPxBxO .
SFX EM 0 ј/xPxE .
SFX EM и ах/xPxE .
SFX EM и ам/xPxE .
SFX EM и ами/xPxE .

SFX EN Y 71
SFX EN ти л .
SFX EN ти ла .
SFX EN ти ло .
SFX EN ти ли .
SFX EN асти у .
SFX EN асти ем .
SFX EN асти еш .
SFX EN асти е .
SFX EN асти емо .
SFX EN асти ете .
SFX EN асти ут .
SFX EN ти ех .
SFX EN ти еше .
SFX EN ти ехмо .
SFX EN ти есте .
SFX EN ти еху .
SFX EN асти и .
SFX EN асти имо .
SFX EN асти ите .
SFX EN асти учи .
SFX EN асти учего .
SFX EN асти учему .
SFX EN асти учим .
SFX EN асти учем .
SFX EN асти учих .
SFX EN асти учими .
SFX EN асти уча .
SFX EN асти учу .
SFX EN асти учеј .
SFX EN асти учеју .
SFX EN асти уче .
SFX EN асти емы .
SFX EN асти емого .
SFX EN асти емому .
SFX EN асти емым .
SFX EN асти емом .
SFX EN асти емо .
SFX EN асти ема .
SFX EN асти ему .
SFX EN асти емој .
SFX EN асти емоју .
SFX EN асти еми .
SFX EN асти еме .
SFX EN асти емых .
SFX EN асти емым .
SFX EN асти емыми .
SFX EN ти ши .
SFX EN ти ша .
SFX EN ти ше .
SFX EN ти ены .
SFX EN ти еного .
SFX EN ти еному .
SFX EN ти еным .
SFX EN ти еном .
SFX EN ти ени .
SFX EN ти ене .
SFX EN ти еных .
SFX EN ти еными .
SFX EN ти ена .
SFX EN ти ену .
SFX EN ти еној .
SFX EN ти еноју .
SFX EN ти ено .
SFX EN ти енје/xPxE .
SFX EN ти енја/xPxE .
SFX EN ти енју/xPxE .
SFX EN ти енјем/xPxE .
SFX EN ти ениј/xPxE .
SFX EN ти енјам/xPxE .
SFX EN ти енјами/xPxE .
SFX EN ти енјах/xPxE .

SFX EO Y 12
SFX EO 0 0/xPxE .
SFX EO а о/xPxBxO .
SFX EO ина ы/xPxE .
SFX EO а у/xPxE .
SFX EO а ы/xPxE .
SFX EO ина 0 .
SFX EO а є/xPxE .
SFX EO ина ах/xPxE .
SFX EO ина ам/xPxE .
SFX EO а оју/xPxE .
SFX EO ина ами/xPxE .
SFX EO а о/xPxE .
