dictionaries/isv_cyr_hunspell_dict.dic
војдти/Dw
прєдок/Dx
пепрец/Dy
потомок/Dx
молдова/Dz
пријети/EA
мєстечко/EB
објети/EC
копијовати/ED
копировати/ED
дане/EE
експанзија/EF
уравенј/EG
се/EH
колибри/EI
путујучи/EJ
панцыровоз/EK
јајца/EL
очи/EM
уши/EM
зајети/EA
прєјети/EA
пасти/EN
данина/EO
подјети/EC
изјети/EC
медија/EL
дєјанја/EL
дєдок/Dx
дробне/EE
јајечко/EB
најети/EA
прадєдок/Dx
јети/EA
наставјенја/EL
одјети/EC
подрасток/Dx
појети/EA
пријети/EA
пројети/EA
тканина/EO
ујети/EA
возрасток/Dx
зајети/EA
сјети/EC
медвєдгризли/EI
мєшанина/EO
недоносок/Dx
сковранок/Dx
свєдок/Dx
зародок/Dx
пони/EI
изнајети/EA
позајети/EA
возјети/EC
јурок/Dx
напасти/EN
изродок/Dx
зимородок/Dx
срдца/EL
пасти/EN
напасти/EN
вєтрец/Dy
прєдпријети/EA
вєречи/EJ
почеткујучи/EJ
лори/EI
приспособјенја/EL
ушко/EB
зомби/EI
